Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5495.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER IV Sec. 1h. (1) A law enforcement officer shall not stop, detain, or arrest an individual based solely on 1 or any combination of an individual's personal characteristics. (2) A law enforcement officer shall not enter a dwelling based on a federal agency administrative warrant. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Immigrant" means an individual residing in the United States who is not a United States citizen, United States national, or person admitted under a nonimmigrant alien as that term is defined by the 8 USC 1101. (b) "Law enforcement officer" means any of the following: (i) A law enforcement officer as that term is defined in section 2 the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.602. (ii) An officer or agent employed by a law enforcement agency of the United States government whose primary responsibility is the enforcement of laws of the United States. (c) "Personal characteristics" means any of the following: (i) Apparent race or ethnicity. (ii) Language spoken or understood or speaking English with an accent. (iii) Presence at a location where immigrants are known to gather. (iv) Employment in a specific industry known to hire immigrants. (v) Domicile is a known home of an immigrant. (vi) Religious affiliation or symbols. (vii) Perceived sexual orientation or gender identity. (viii) Perceived political affiliations or opinions. Sec. 15d. (1) A federal law enforcement officer may enforce state law to the same extent as a state or local officer only if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The officer is authorized under federal law to arrest a person, with or without a warrant, for a violation of a federal statute. (b) The officer is authorized by federal law to carry a firearm in the performance of his or her the officer's duties. (c) The officer is not in violation of section 1h. (d) (c) One or more of the following apply: (i) The officer possesses a state warrant for the arrest of the person for the commission of a felony. (ii) The officer has received positive information from an authoritative source, in writing or by telegraph, telephone, teletype, radio, computer, or other means, that another federal law enforcement officer or a peace officer possesses a state warrant for the arrest of the person for the commission of a felony. (iii) The officer is participating in a joint investigation conducted by a federal agency and a state or local law enforcement agency. (iv) The officer is acting pursuant to the request of a state or local law enforcement officer or agency. (v) The officer is responding to an emergency. (2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), a federal law enforcement officer who meets the requirements of subsection (1) has the privileges and immunities of a peace officer of this state. (3) This section does not impose liability upon or require indemnification by the state or a local unit of government for an act performed by a federal law enforcement officer under this section. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Emergency" means a sudden or unexpected circumstance that requires immediate action to protect the health, safety, welfare, or property of an individual from actual or threatened harm or from an unlawful act. (b) "Local unit of government" means a county, city, village, or township.